apertium-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet>ABCČĆDDžĐEFGHIJKLLjMNNjOPRSŠTUVZŽabcčćddžđefghijklljmnnjoprsštuvzž</alphabet>
<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>
<sdef n="vblex"/>
<sdef n="p1"/>
<sdef n="pri"/>

</sdefs>
<pardefs>
<pardef n="gramophone">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
<e><p><l>im</l><r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
</pardefs>
<section id="main" type="standard">
<e lm="gramophone"><i>gramophone</i><par n="gramophone"/></e>
<e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>

</section>
</dictionary>
